District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-207.03

Rules.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 703, 29 DCR 1060
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-150, § 3, 31 DCR 6425
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 502(g), 42 DCR 3684

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-207.3.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 502(f) of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 4-207.01.